Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 29. Mississippi Commission on the Holocaust

§ 39-29-1.
Mississippi Commission on the Holocaust created; membership; rules and regulations; gifts, grants and donations; compensation.

There is created the Mississippi Commission on the Holocaust in the executive branch of state government. The commission shall be assigned to the Office of the Secretary of State for administrative purposes only.

The commission shall be composed of the following members:

Ex officio members as follows:

The State Superintendent of Public Education or his or her designee;

Commissioner of Institutions of Higher Learning or his or her designee;

Public members as follows:

Seven (7) public members, at least one (1) from each of the congressional districts, to be appointed by the Governor;

Five (5) public members, at least one (1) from each of the congressional districts, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

Five (5) public members, at least one (1) from each of the congressional districts, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.

The public members of the commission shall be residents of this state and shall be appointed with due regard for broad geographic representation. The public members should include, but are not be limited to, the following:

Individuals who have served prominently as spokespersons for or as leaders of organizations or corporations that serve members of religious, ethnic, national heritage, or social groups that were subjected to genocide, torture, wrongful deprivation of liberty or property, officially imposed or sanctioned violence, and other forms of human rights violations and persecution at the hands of the Nazis and their collaborators during the Nazi era;

Individuals who are experienced in the field of Holocaust education;

Individuals who represent liberators of victims of the Holocaust; or

Lay persons who have an interest in Holocaust education.

Public members of the commission shall be appointed for the terms of five (5) years and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. Public members may be eligible for reappointment. The office of any member of the commission who fails to attend more than two (2) consecutive meetings of the commission without an excuse approved by a resolution of the commission shall become vacant. All vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original appointment, and the person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The commission shall have a chairperson who shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of five (5) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

Seven (7) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the commission. Public members shall have the right to vote on any matter before the commission, but ex officio members and their designees shall not have the right to vote.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint a member of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor shall appoint a member of the Senate to serve as advisors to the commission.

The Mississippi Commission on the Holocaust shall adopt rules and regulations and set standards and policies for the organization, operation, management, budgeting and programs of the commission.

The commission shall provide, based upon the collective knowledge and experience of its members, assistance and advice to public and private schools, colleges and universities with respect to the implementation of Holocaust education and awareness programs.

The commission shall meet with appropriate education officials and other interested public and private organizations, including service organizations, for the purpose of providing information, planning, coordination, or modification of courses of study or programs dealing with the subject of the Holocaust.

The commission shall survey and catalogue the extent of the Holocaust and genocide education presently being incorporated into the curricula and taught in the educational system of this state.

The commission shall inventory those Holocaust memorials, exhibits and resources that could not be incorporated into courses of study or programs at various locations and other educational agencies for the development and implementation of Holocaust and genocide education programs. In furtherance of this responsibility, the commission may contact and cooperate with existing Holocaust and genocide public and private nonprofit resource organizations and may act as a liaison concerning Holocaust and genocide education or members of the United States Senate and House of Representatives, the Mississippi Senate and House of Representatives, the United States Holocaust Memorial Museum and other national and international Holocaust agencies.

The commission shall compile a roster of individual volunteers who are willing to share their verifiable knowledge and experience in classrooms, seminars and workshops on the subject of the Holocaust. The volunteers may be survivors of the Holocaust, liberators of concentration camps, scholars, members of the clergy, community relations professionals, and other persons who, by virtue of their experience, education, or interest, have experience with the Holocaust.

The commission shall coordinate events memorializing the Holocaust and seek volunteers who are willing and able to participate in commemorative events that will enhance public awareness of the significance of the Holocaust.

The commission shall prepare reports for the Governor and the Legislature regarding its findings and recommendations to facilitate the inclusion of Holocaust studies and special programs memorializing the Holocaust in educational systems of this state.

The commission shall appoint advisory committees to advise the commission on the fulfillment of its duties.

The commission may receive gifts, grants and donations from any public or private sources. Members of the commission may not be compensated for the performance of their duties except from funds that are specifically appropriated therefor by the Legislature or from gifts, grants or donations.

HISTORY:
Laws of 2004, ch. 432, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.